Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1201.22
Administrative Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) There is hereby created the Administrative Cash Fund to be administered by the department. Revenue from the following sources shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund:

(a) Fees charged for the sale of department publications or subscription to publications;

(b) Fees charged for the sale of Nebraska items promoting economic development of the state;

(c) Deposits charged for the temporary use of Nebraska items promoting economic development of the state;

(d) Fees charged for attendance and participation in department-sponsored conferences, training sessions, and other special events;

(e) Money collected from nondepartment sources in connection with cooperative funding of advertising, marketing, promotional, or consulting activities;

(f) Application fees collected under section 81-12,110; and

(g) Money received by the department in the form of gifts, grants, reimbursements, or appropriations from any source intended to be used by the department for carrying out the provisions of Chapter 81, article 12.

(2) Revenue from the fund may be expended for the following purposes:

(a) Production and distribution costs of department publications;

(b) Purchase of items promoting economic development of the state intended for sale;

(c) Reimbursement of deposits collected for the temporary use of promotional items;

(d) Payment of costs in connection with department-sponsored conferences, training sessions, and other special events;

(e) Payment of costs of advertising, marketing, promotional, or consulting activities in cooperative funding partnerships with nondepartment organizations;

(f) Payment of costs for which fund revenue has been received and which are related to department activities in Chapter 81, article 12; and

(g) Beginning January 1, 2027, payment of costs of audits and administration of the Teleworker Job Creation Act.

(3) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Administrative Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 19;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 122;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 73;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 184.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Teleworker Job Creation Act, see section 48-3001.